Mississippi, session 2026, HB1823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Education Enhancement Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the State Department of Education for the purpose of providing funds for the Student 24/7 Teletherapy Pilot Project established under House Bill No. 1463, 2026 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 ................................................. $ 2,400,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Education Enhancement Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.